Illinois, session 104th, HB3535.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Motor Fuel Tax Law is amended by changing 5Section 8b as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 505/8b)7    Sec. 8b. Transportation Renewal Fund; creation; 8distribution of proceeds.9    (a) The Transportation Renewal Fund is hereby created as a 10special fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the Fund shall be 11used as provided in this Section: 12        (1) 80% of the moneys in the Fund shall be used for 13    highway maintenance, highway construction, bridge repair, 14    congestion relief, and construction of aviation 15    facilities; of that 80%: 16            (A) before Fiscal Year 2026 and for Fiscal Year 17        2031 and thereafter, the the State Comptroller shall 18        order transferred and the State Treasurer shall 19        transfer 60% to the State Construction Account Fund; 20        those moneys shall be used solely for construction, 21        reconstruction, improvement, repair, maintenance, 22        operation, and administration of highways and are 23        limited to payments made pursuant to design and   HB3535- 2 -LRB104 08055 HLH 18101 b1        construction contracts awarded by the Department of 2        Transportation; and 3            (B) before Fiscal Year 2026 and for Fiscal Year 4        2031 and thereafter, 40% 40% shall be distributed by 5        the Department of Transportation to municipalities, 6        counties, and road districts of the State using the 7        percentages set forth in subdivisions (A), (B), (C), 8        and (D) of paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 9        8; distributions to particular municipalities, 10        counties, and road districts under this subdivision 11        (B) shall be made according to the allocation 12        procedures described for municipalities, counties, and 13        road districts in subsection (e) of Section 8 and 14        shall be subject to the same requirements and 15        limitations described in that subsection; and 16            (C) beginning with Fiscal Year 2026 and continuing 17        through Fiscal Year 2030, the State Comptroller shall 18        order transferred and the State Treasurer shall 19        transfer 40% to the State Construction Account Fund; 20        those moneys shall be used solely for construction, 21        reconstruction, improvement, repair, maintenance, 22        operation, and administration of highways and are 23        limited to payments made pursuant to design and 24        construction contracts awarded by the Department of 25        Transportation; and 26            (D) beginning with Fiscal Year 2026 and continuing   HB3535- 3 -LRB104 08055 HLH 18101 b1        through Fiscal Year 2030, 60% shall be distributed by 2        the Department of Transportation to municipalities, 3        counties, and road districts of the State using the 4        percentages set forth in subdivisions (A), (B), (C), 5        and (D) of paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 6        8; distributions to particular municipalities, 7        counties, and road districts under this subdivision 8        (B) shall be made according to the allocation 9        procedures described for municipalities, counties, and 10        road districts in subsection (e) of Section 8 and 11        shall be subject to the same requirements and 12        limitations described in that subsection; and 13        (2) 20% of the moneys in the Fund shall be used for 14    projects related to rail facilities and mass transit 15    facilities, as defined in Section 2705-305 of the 16    Department of Transportation Law of the Civil 17    Administrative Code of Illinois, including rapid transit, 18    rail, high-speed rail, bus and other equipment in 19    connection with the State or a unit of local government, 20    special district, municipal corporation, or other public 21    agency authorized to provide and promote public 22    transportation within the State; of that 20%: 23            (A) 90% shall be deposited into the Regional 24        Transportation Authority Capital Improvement Fund, a 25        special fund created in the State Treasury; moneys in 26        the Regional Transportation Authority Capital   HB3535- 4 -LRB104 08055 HLH 18101 b1        Improvement Fund shall be used by the Regional 2        Transportation Authority for construction, 3        improvements, and deferred maintenance on mass transit 4        facilities and acquisition of buses and other 5        equipment; and 6            (B) 10% shall be deposited into the Downstate Mass 7        Transportation Capital Improvement Fund, a special 8        fund created in the State Treasury; moneys in the 9        Downstate Mass Transportation Capital Improvement Fund 10        shall be used by local mass transit districts other 11        than the Regional Transportation Authority for 12        construction, improvements, and deferred maintenance 13        on mass transit facilities and acquisition of buses 14        and other equipment. 15    (b) (Blank). 16(Source: P.A. 103-866, eff. 8-9-24.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.